core/server/Samples/MyProjects/GyroGears/layouts/default/ro_RO.aff
SFX A Y 93
SFX A   ă     a       ă                  s.f.sg.art.
SFX A   ă     o       ă
SFX A   ă     ei      [^s]ă              s.f.sg.dat.
SFX A   ă     e       [^s]ă              s.f.pl.neart.
SFX A   ă     ele     [^s]ă              s.f.pl.art.
SFX A   ă     elor    [^s]ă              s.f.pl.dat.
SFX A   ă     ei      [^a]să             s.f.sg.dat.
SFX A   ă     e       [^a]să             s.f.pl.neart.
SFX A   ă     ele     [^a]să            s.f.pl.art.
SFX A   ă     elor    [^a]să            s.f.pl.dat.
SFX A   ă     ei      [^e]asă           s.f.sg.dat.
SFX A   ă     e       [^e]asă           s.f.pl.neart.
SFX A   ă     ele     [^e]asă          s.f.pl.art.
SFX A   ă     elor    [^e]asă           s.f.pl.dat.
SFX A   asă   sei     easă       s.f.sg.dat
SFX A   asă   se      easă       s.f.pl.neart.
SFX A   asă   sele    easă       s.f.pl.art.
SFX A   asă   selor   easă       s.f.pl.dat.
SFX A   0     a       [^i]e          s.f.sg.art.
SFX A   0     o       [^i]e
SFX A   0     a-i       [^i]e
SFX A   e     a       ie             s.f.sg.art.
SFX A   e     o       ie
SFX A   e     a-i       ie
SFX A   are   ării    [^oi]are       s.f.sg.dat.
SFX A   are   ări     [^oi]are       s.f.pl.neart.
SFX A   are   ările   [^oi]are      s.f.pl.art.
SFX A   are   ărilor  [^oi]are      s.f.pl.dat.
SFX A   are   erii    iare       s.f.sg.dat.
SFX A   are   eri     iare       s.f.pl.neart.
SFX A   are   erile   iare       s.f.pl.art.
SFX A   are   erilor  iare       s.f.pl.dat.
SFX A   oare     orii       oare        s.f.sg.dat.
SFX A   oare     ori      oare       s.f.pl.art.
SFX A   oare     oarele      oare       s.f.pl.art.
SFX A   oare     orilor    oare       s.f.pl.dat.
SFX A   e     ii      ere            s.f.sg.dat.
SFX A   e     i       ere            s.f.pl.neart.
SFX A   e     ile     ere            s.f.pl.art.
SFX A   e     ilor    ere            s.f.pl.dat.
SFX A   e     ii      âre            s.f.sg.dat.
SFX A   e     i       âre            s.f.pl.neart.
SFX A   e     ile     âre            s.f.pl.art.
SFX A   e     ilor    âre            s.f.pl.dat.
SFX A   e     ii      [iu]ne       s.f.sg.dat.
SFX A   e     i       [iu]ne       s.f.pl.neart.
SFX A   e     ile     [iu]ne      s.f.pl.art.
SFX A   e     ilor    [iu]ne      s.f.pl.dat.
SFX A   0     i       [^e]ie      s.f.pl.neart.
SFX A   e     i       ie           s.f.pl.neart.
SFX A   e     ile     [^e]ie      s.f.pl.art.
SFX A   e     ilor    [^e]ie      s.f.pl.dat.
SFX A   e     0       eie      s.f.sg.dat.
SFX A   e     le      eie      s.f.pl.art.
SFX A   e     lor     eie      s.f.pl.dat.
SFX A   ate   ății    ate       s.f.sg.dat.
SFX A   ate   ăți     ate       s.f.pl.neart.
SFX A   ate   ățile   ate       s.f.pl.neart.
SFX A   ate   ăților  ate       s.f.pl.dat.
SFX A   te   ții    [^a]te       s.f.sg.dat.
SFX A   te   ți     [^a]te       s.f.pl.neart.
SFX A   te   țile   [^a]te       s.f.pl.neart.
SFX A   te   ților  [^a]te       s.f.pl.dat.
SFX A   0     ua      a         s.f.sg.art.
SFX A   0     o      a
SFX A   0     lei     [^e]a        s.f.sg.dat.
SFX A   0     le      [^e]a        s.f.pl.neart.
SFX A   0     lele    [^e]a        s.f.pl.art.
SFX A   0     lelor   [^e]a         s.f.pl.dat.
SFX A   a     lei     ea          s.f.sg.dat.
SFX A   a     le      ea          s.f.pl.neart.
SFX A   a     lele    ea          s.f.pl.art.
SFX A   a     lelor   ea          s.f.pl.dat.
SFX A   e     eo   ime
SFX A   e     i   ime       s.f.pl.neart.
SFX A   e     ii   ime       s.f.sg.dat.
SFX A   e     ile   ime      s.f.pl.art.
SFX A   e     ilor   ime     s.f.pl.dat.
SFX A   e     i   lme       s.f.pl.neart.
SFX A   e     ii   lme       s.f.sg.dat.
SFX A   e     ile   lme      s.f.pl.art.
SFX A   e     ilor   lme     s.f.pl.dat.
SFX A   e     i   ce        s.f.pl.neart.
SFX A   e     ii   ce        s.f.sg.dat.
SFX A   e     ile   ce      s.f.pl.art.
SFX A   e     ilor   ce      s.f.pl.dat.
SFX A   0     i      ee   s.f.sg.dat
SFX A   0     le   ee   s.f.pl.art
SFX A   0     lor  ee   s.f.pl.dat
SFX A   0    i     țe
SFX A   0    ii     țe
SFX A   0    ile     țe
SFX A   0    ilor     țe
#end********************************************************************************


#********************************************************************************
# neutre: abajur/abajurui (C) sau șablon/șabloane (MP)
SFX C Y 15
SFX C 0 u  [^u]
SFX C 0 u-i  [^u]
SFX C 0 ul  [^u]            s.n. sg. art.
SFX C 0 uri  [^u]           s.n. pl. neart.
SFX C 0 urile  [^u]         s.n. pl. art.
SFX C 0 urilor  [^u]        s.n. pl. dat.
SFX C 0 ului  [^u]          s.n. sg. dat.
SFX C 0 ule  [^u]
SFX C 0 -i u                  
SFX C 0 l u                  s.n. sg. art.
SFX C 0 ri u                  s.n. pl. neart.
SFX C 0 rile u               s.n. pl. art.
SFX C 0 rilor u             s.n. pl. dat.
SFX C 0 lui u               s.n. sg. dat.
SFX C 0 le u

SFX c Y 9
SFX c 0 u  [^u]
SFX c 0 u-i  [^u]
SFX c 0 ul  [^u]            s.n. sg. art.
SFX c 0 ului  [^u]          s.n. sg. dat.
SFX c 0 ule  [^u]
SFX c 0 -i u                  
SFX c 0 l u                  s.n. sg. art.
SFX c 0 lui u               s.n. sg. dat.
SFX c 0 le u



SFX M Y 10
SFX M 0 u .
SFX M 0 ul .               s.n.sg.art.
SFX M 0 ului .             s.n.sg.dat.
SFX M 0 ule .
SFX M 0 e [^n]             s.n.pl.neart.
SFX M 0 ele [^n]           s.n.pl.art.
SFX M 0 elor [^n]          s.n.pl.dat.
SFX M on oane on            s.n.pl.neart.
SFX M on oanele on          s.n.pl.art.
SFX M on oanelor on         s.n.pl.dat.
